sl-SI: Vrsta britvice: Varnostna; Ravno; Drugo
th: ประเภทมีดโกน: ความปลอดภัย; ผมตรง; อื่นๆ
de: Rasierertyp: Sicherheitsrasierer; Glatt; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Vrsta britve: Sigurna; Ravna; Ostalo
fi: Partakonetyyppi: Turvallisuus; Suorat; Muu
it: Tipo di rasoio: Sicurezza; Dritto; Altro
pt-BR: Tipo de lâmina de barbear: De segurança; Liso; Outro
sk-SK: Typ holiaceho strojčeka: Bezpečnosť; Rovný; Iné
vi: Loại dao cạo: An toàn; Tóc thẳng; Khác
tr: Kesici Tipi: Emniyet; Düz; Diğer
ko: 면도기 유형: 안전; 일자형; 기타
ja: カミソリの種類: 安全; ストレート; その他
zh-TW: 刮鬍刀類型: 安全; 直; 其他
zh-CN: 剃须刀类型: 安全; 直; 其他
pl: Typ maszynki do golenia: Bezpieczeństwo; Prosta; Inne
lt-LT: Skustuvo tipas: Su apsauga; Tiesus; Kita
el: Τύπος ξυραφιού: Ασφάλεια; Ευθεία; Άλλο
sv: Typ av rakhyvel: Säkerhet; Rakt; Övrigt
es: Tipo de navaja: Seguridad; Liso; Otros
cs: Typ břitvy: Bezpečnostní; Rovné; Jiné
nb: Barberhøveltype: Sikkerhet; Rett; Annet
ro-RO: Tip de brici: Siguranță; Drept; Altele
fr: Type de rasoir: De sûreté; Lisses; Autre
bg-BG: Тип самобръсначка: Безопасност; Право; Други
hu: Borotva típusa: Biztonsági; Egyenes; Egyéb
da: Barbermaskinetype: Sikkerhed; Lige; Andet
nl: Scheermestype: Veiligheid; Steil; Andere
pt-PT: Tipo de lâmina de barbear: Segurança; Liso; Outro
en: Razor type: Safety; Straight; Other
ru: Тип бритвы: Безопасный; Прямой; Другой